District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-2620

Imposition of civil fines, penalties, and fees; adjudications

Repealed.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 1104(c), 33 DCR 729

History

1981 Ed., §§ 2-2201 to 2-2220.

Prior Codifications